Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.685

Border county higher education opportunity project—Created.

(1)(a) The border county higher education opportunity project is created. The purpose of the project is to allow Washington institutions of higher education that are located in counties on the Oregon border to implement tuition policies that correspond to Oregon policies. Under the border county project, Columbia Basin Community College, Clark College, Lower Columbia Community College, Grays Harbor Community College, and Walla Walla Community College may enroll students who reside in the bordering Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, and Washington at resident tuition rates.

(b) The Tri-Cities and Vancouver branches of Washington State University may enroll students who reside in the bordering Oregon counties of Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, and Washington for eight credits or less at resident tuition rates.

(2) Columbia Basin Community College, Clark College, Lower Columbia Community College, Grays Harbor Community College, and Walla Walla Community College may enroll students at resident tuition rates who:

(a) Are currently domiciled in Washington;

(b) Relocated to Washington from one of the thirteen counties identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section within the previous twelve months; and

(c) Were domiciled in one of the thirteen counties identified in subsection (1)(a) of this section for at least ninety days immediately before relocating to Washington.

(3) The Tri-Cities and Vancouver branches of Washington State University may enroll students for eight credits or less at resident tuition rates who:

(a) Are currently domiciled in Washington;

(b) Relocated to Washington from one of the nine counties identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section within the previous twelve months; and

(c) Were domiciled in one of the nine counties identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section for at least ninety days immediately before relocating to Washington.

(4) Washington institutions of higher education participating in the project shall give priority program enrollment to Washington residents.

[ 2009 c 158 s 1; 2003 c 159 s 2; 2002 c 130 s 2; 2000 c 160 s 3; 1999 c 320 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.80.806.]

NOTES:

Resident tuition rates—Border county higher education opportunity project: RCW 28B.15.0139.